Washington statutes.
RCW 36.26.020

Public defender district—Creation—Office of public defender.

The board of county commissioners of any single county or of any two or more territorially contiguous counties or acting in cooperation with the governing authority of any city located within the county or counties may, by resolution or by ordinance, or by concurrent resolutions or concurrent ordinances, constitute such county or counties or counties and cities as a public defender district, and may establish an office of public defender for such district.

[ 1969 c 94 s 2.]